District of Columbia statutes.
1-607.02

Special provisions for persons with physical or developmental disabilities.

The Mayor may develop rules and regulations which authorize the inquiry into bona fide job-related qualifications which may affect persons with physical or developmental disabilities, prior to appointing such individuals under the authority of § 1-609.04(2). Persons with physical or developmental disabilities who apply for positions under the authority of subchapters VIII and VIII-A of this chapter may be examined to assure that their level of skills is sufficient to meet minimal job qualifications.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 702, 25 DCR 5740
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 3(b)(2)-(4), 53 DCR 6198
D.C. Law 16-305 substituted “persons with physical or developmental disabilities” for “persons with physical handicaps of developmental disabilities” and “Persons with physical or developmental disabilities” for “Physically handicapped or developmentally disabled person”.
1973 Ed., § 1-337.2.
1981 Ed., § 1-607.2.